Maine, session 132, LD705.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5124-C, sub-§1-B, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt.
ZZZ, §5, is amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) For single individuals and married persons filing separate returns, $12,000
$15,000;
Sec. 2. PL 2025, c. 650, Part N, section 8 is amended to read:
Sec. N-8. Application. This Act Part applies to taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. PL 2025, c. 650, Part FF, section 4 is amended to read:
Sec. FF-4. Cost-of-living adjustment for essential support workers;
MaineCare rates. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department
of Health and Human Services shall submit a request to seek approval from the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to implement a cost-of-living adjustment of 3.07% for reimbursement rates
subject to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Sections 13, 65 and
92 and rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Sections 2, 12, 17, 18,
19, 20, 21, 26, 28, 29, 40, 67, 96 and 97 Appendix C effective January 1, 2027 and for
reimbursement rates subject to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III,
Section 97 Appendix B and Section 97 Appendix D effective July 1, 2026. The department
shall submit the request required to seek approval under this section to implement the cost-
of-living adjustment as soon as practicable.
Sec. 4. Transfer from MaineCare Stabilization Fund; General Fund.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2027, the State
Controller shall transfer $1,653,131 from the MaineCare Stabilization Fund Other Special
Revenue Funds account within the Department of Health and Human Services to the
unappropriated surplus of the General Fund.
Page 1 - 132LR2321(03)

Sec. 5. Funds to address unmet needs of older adults; distribution to area
agencies on aging. Funds appropriated in the amount of $3,000,000 to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Office of Aging and Disability Services Central Office
program in Public Law 2025, chapter 650, Part A, section 17 to address unmet needs of
older adults through community-based services and programs delivered by the area agency
in each of the State's coordinated community program areas must be distributed to the area
agencies, based on priorities identified by local advisory councils to meet regional needs,
through the intrastate funding formula to develop programs and deliver services necessary
for the general well-being of older adults, including, but not limited to, in-home services,
case management services, meals programs, wellness services, respite for caregivers,
public education and outreach, volunteer services and information and referral services.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Early Childhood Nutrition Grant Program N583
Initiative: Provides ongoing, nonlapsing funding for a grant program to allow school
administrative units to enter into agreements with providers of off-site public preschool
programs to provide students in those programs with breakfast, lunch and a snack.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $375,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $375,000
Early Childhood Nutrition Grant Program N583
Initiative: Deappropriates one-time, nonlapsing funding for a grant program to allow school
administrative units to enter into agreements with providers of off-site public preschool
programs to provide students in those programs with breakfast, lunch and a snack.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($375,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($375,000)
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for direct care
services subject to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 28.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 2 - 132LR2321(03)

All Other $0 $841,377
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $841,377
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,235,634
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,235,634
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $122,894
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $122,894
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for direct care
services subject to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 97
Appendix B and Section 97 Appendix D.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,598,732
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $0 $1,598,732
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $36,304
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $0 $36,304
Mental Health Services - Child Medicaid Z207
Initiative: Provides funding to implement a cost-of-living adjustment for direct care
services subject to rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter III, Section 97
Appendix B and Section 97 Appendix D.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $811,754
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $811,754
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $1,653,131
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $2,834,366
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $0 $159,198
Page 3 - 132LR2321(03)

__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $4,646,695
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Low-income Home Energy Assistance - MSHA 0708
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for low-income electric ratepayer assistance.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $7,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $7,500,000
Low-income Home Energy Assistance - MSHA 0708
Initiative: Deappropriates one-time funding for low-income electric ratepayer assistance.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 ($7,500,000)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($7,500,000)
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0
SECTION TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $1,653,131
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $0 $2,834,366
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $0 $159,198
__________ __________
SECTION TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $4,646,695
Page 4 - 132LR2321(03)